California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 records, grades, evaluations, criminal records, medical records, health records, social security number, biometric information, disabilities, socioeconomic information, food purchases, political affiliations, religious information, text messages, documents, pupil identifiers, search activity, photographs, voice recordings, or geolocation information.

(3) “Online service” includes cloud computing services, which must comply with this section if they otherwise meet the definition of an operator. 

(4) “Operator” means the operator of an internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application with actual knowledge that the site, service, or application is used primarily for preschool or prekindergarten purposes and was designed and marketed for preschool
 and prekindergarten purposes.

(5) “Preschool or prekindergarten purposes” means purposes that customarily take place at the direction of the preschool, prekindergarten, teacher, or school district, or aid in the administration of preschool or prekindergarten activities, including, but not limited to, instruction in the classroom or at home, administrative activities, and collaboration between pupils, preschool or prekindergarten personnel, or parents, or are for the use and benefit of the preschool or prekindergarten.

(6) “Pupil” means a child enrolled in a preschool or prekindergarten course of instruction.

(b) An operator shall not knowingly engage in any of the following activities with respect to their site, service, or
 application:

(1) (A) Engage in targeted advertising on the operator’s site, service, or application.

(B) Target advertising on any other site, service, or application when the targeting of the advertising is based upon any information, including covered information and persistent unique identifiers, that the operator has acquired because of the use of that operator’s site, service, or application described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(2) Use information, including persistent unique identifiers, created or gathered by the operator’s site, service, or application, to amass a profile about a pupil, except in furtherance of preschool or prekindergarten purposes.

(3) Sell a pupil’s information, including covered information. This prohibition does not apply to the purchase, merger, or other type of acquisition of an operator by another entity, provided that the operator or successor entity continues to be subject to the provisions of this section with respect to previously acquired pupil information.

(4) Disclose covered information unless the disclosure is made:

(A) In furtherance of the preschool and prekindergarten purposes of the site, service, or application, provided that the recipient of the covered information disclosed pursuant to this subparagraph:

(i) Shall not further disclose the information unless done to allow
 or improve operability and functionality within that pupil’s preschool or prekindergarten.

(ii) Is legally required to comply with subdivision (d);

(B) To ensure legal and regulatory compliance;

(C) To respond to or participate in a judicial process;

(D) To protect the safety of users or others or security of the site; or

(E) To a service provider, provided the operator contractually (i) prohibits the service provider from using any covered information for any purpose other than providing the contracted service to, or on behalf of, the operator, (ii) prohibits the service provider from disclosing any
 covered information provided by the operator with subsequent third parties, and (iii) requires the service provider to implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices as provided in subdivision (d).

(c) Subdivision (b) does not prohibit the operator’s use of information for maintaining, developing, supporting, improving, or diagnosing the operator’s site, service, or application.

(d) An operator shall do all of the following:

(1) Implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the covered information, and protect that information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(2) Delete a pupil’s covered information if the preschool, prekindergarten, or district requests deletion of data under the control of the preschool, prekindergarten, or district.

(3) (A) Delete a pupil’s CCPA-excluded covered information under the operator’s control if a pupil’s parent, guardian, or education rights holder or, in the case of a former pupil 18 years of age or older, the pupil requests an operator to delete the covered information under the operator’s control if the pupil has been no longer enrolled in the preschool, prekindergarten,
 or district for at least 60 days.

(B) Before deleting any information described in subparagraph (A), the operator shall require documentation that the pupil is no longer enrolled in the preschool, prekindergarten, or district.

(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), an operator may disclose covered information of a pupil, as long as paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) are not violated, under the following circumstances:

(1) If other provisions of federal or state law require the operator to disclose the information,
 and the operator complies with the requirements of federal and state law in protecting and disclosing that information.

(2) For legitimate research purposes: (A) as required by state or federal law and subject to the restrictions under applicable state and federal law or (B) as allowed by state or federal law and under the direction of a preschool, prekindergarten, school district, or state department of education, if no covered information is used for any purpose in furtherance of advertising or to amass a profile on the pupil for purposes other than preschool and prekindergarten purposes.

(3) To a state or local educational agency, including preschools, prekindergartens, and school districts, for preschool and prekindergarten purposes, as permitted by state or federal law.

(f) This section does not prohibit an operator from using deidentified pupil covered information as follows:

(1) Within the operator’s site, service, or application or other sites, services, or applications owned by the operator to improve educational products.

(2) To demonstrate the effectiveness of the operator’s products or services, including in their marketing.

(g) This section does not prohibit an operator from sharing aggregated deidentified pupil covered information for the development and improvement of educational sites, services, or applications.

(h) This section does not limit the
 authority of a law enforcement agency to obtain any content or information from an operator as authorized by law or pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(i) This section does not limit the ability of an operator to use a pupil’s data, including covered information, for adaptive learning or customized early learning purposes.

(j) This section does not apply to general audience internet websites, general audience online services, general audience online applications, or general audience mobile applications, even if login credentials created for an operator’s site, service, or application may be used to access those general audience sites, services, or applications.

(k) This section does not
 limit internet service providers from providing internet connectivity to preschools, prekindergartens, or pupils and their families.

(l) This section does not prohibit an operator of an internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application from marketing educational products directly to parents so long as the marketing did not result from the use of covered information obtained by the operator through the provision of services covered under this section.

(m) This section does not impose a duty upon a provider of an electronic store, gateway, marketplace, or other means of purchasing or downloading software or applications to review or enforce compliance of this section on those applications or software.

(n) This section does not impose a duty upon a provider of an interactive computer service, as defined in Section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code, to review or enforce compliance with this section by third-party content providers.

(o) This section does not impede the ability of pupils to download, export, or otherwise save or maintain their own personally created data or documents.

(p) This section shall not be interpreted to limit or supersede any rights or requirements under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.), and any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to those laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 935, Sec. 3.   (AB 801)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22587.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   (AB 2799)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: This section prescribed a delayed operative date for Ch. 22.2.5, commencing with Section 22586.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.2.7. Student Test Taker Privacy Protection Act [22588. - 22588.]

22588.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22584 of the Business and Professions Code, a business providing proctoring services in an educational setting shall collect, use, retain, and disclose only the personal information strictly necessary to provide those services.

(b) This section shall not prohibit a business from collecting, using, retaining, or disclosing personal information if doing so is necessary for any of the following:

(1) To comply with federal, state, or local law.

(2) To comply with a court order or subpoena.

(3) To comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by a federal, state, or local agency authorized by law to conduct that inquiry or investigation, or authorized to serve a subpoena or summons, as applicable.

(A) A law enforcement agency may direct a business, pursuant to a law enforcement agency-approved investigation with an active case number, not to delete a consumer’s personal information, and, upon receipt of that direction, a business shall not delete the personal information for 90 days, in order to allow the law enforcement agency to obtain a court order or subpoena to obtain the consumer’s personal information.

(B) A business that has received direction from a law enforcement agency not to delete a consumer’s personal information that otherwise would not be permissible to retain or disclose pursuant to this section shall not use or disclose the consumer’s personal information for any purpose except in response to a court order or subpoena.

(4) To
 cooperate with a law enforcement agency concerning conduct or activity that the business reasonably and in good faith believes to violate federal, state, or local law.

(5) To cooperate with a government agency request for emergency access to a consumer’s personal information if a natural person is at imminent risk of death or serious physical injury, provided that all of the following are met:

(A) The request is approved by a high-ranking agency officer for emergency access to a consumer’s personal information.

(B) The request is based on the agency’s good faith determination that it has a lawful basis to access the information on a nonemergency basis.

(C) The agency
 agrees to petition a court for an appropriate order within three days and to destroy the information if that order is not granted.

(6) To exercise or defend a legal claim.

(c) For purposes of this section, “personal information” has the same meaning as in Section 1798.140 of the Civil Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, “proctoring services” includes, but is not limited to, services offered by a business to
 observe, monitor, or administer an exam.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   (SB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.2.8. Youth Social Media Protection Act [22588.2. - 22588.4.]

22588.2.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) (1) “Content” means statements or comments made by users and media, including audio, pictures, video, and text, that are created, posted, shared, or otherwise interacted with by users on an internet-based service or application.

(2) “Content” does not include media put on a service or application exclusively for the purpose of cloud storage, transmitting files, or file collaboration.

(b) “Cyberbullying” means any severe or pervasive conduct made by an electronic act or acts, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (r) of Section 48900 of the Education Code and Section 22589, committed by a person directed toward another person that has or can be reasonably predicted to have the effect of one or more of the following:

(1) Placing a reasonable person in fear of bodily harm or harm to that person’s property.

(2) Causing a reasonable person to experience a substantially detrimental effect on the person’s physical or mental health.

(3) Causing a reasonable person to experience substantial interference with the person’s academic performance.

(4) Causing a reasonable person to experience substantial interference with the person’s ability to participate in or benefit from the
 services, activities, or privileges provided by a school.

(c) (1) “Large social media platform” means a social media platform that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The social media platform’s terms of service do not prohibit the use of the social media platform by a child.

(B) The social media platform includes features that enable a child to share images, text, or video through the internet with other users of the social media platform whom the child has met, identified, or become aware of solely through the use of the social media platform.

(C) The social media platform has more than 100,000,000 monthly global active users or
 generates more than one billion
 dollars ($1,000,000,000) in gross revenue per year, adjusted yearly for inflation.

(2) “Large social media platform” does not include any of the following:

(A) A service that primarily serves to facilitate the sale or provision of professional services or the sale of commercial products.

(B) A service that primarily provides news or information and does not offer the ability for content to be sent by a user directly to a child.

(C) A service that has features that enable a user who communicates directly with a child through a message, including a text, audio, or video message, not otherwise available to other users of the service, to add
 other users to that message that the child may not have otherwise met, identified, or become aware of solely through the use of the service and does not have any features described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(d) “Public or semipublic internet-based service or application” does not include a service or application used to facilitate communication within a business or enterprise among employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise, if access to the service or application is restricted to employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise using the service or application.

(e) “Risk” means a social media-related threat that more likely than not will cause harm to a child.

(f) “Severe risk” means a social
 media-related threat that more likely than not will cause serious bodily or mental harm to a child.

(g) “Social media platform”
 has the same meaning as defined in Section 22675.

(h) “Social media-related threat” means content that promotes, incites, facilitates, or perpetrates any of the following:

(1) Suicide.

(2) Disordered eating.

(3) Drug trafficking.

(4) Substance abuse.

(5) Fraud.

(6) Human trafficking punishable pursuant to Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.

(7) Sexual abuse.

(8) Cyberbullying.

(9) Harassment.

(10) Distribution of harmful matter, as defined by Section 313 of the Penal Code.

(i) “Substantively respond” means to inform a person who makes a report pursuant to Section 22588.3 that the content being reported meets either of the following criteria:

(1) The content does not violate the terms of service of the large social media platform.

(2) The content violates the terms and conditions of the large social media platform.

(j) “Terms of service” means a public-facing policy or set of policies adopted by a social media platform that specifies, at least, the user behavior and activities that are permitted on the social media platform and the user behavior and activities that may result in the social media platform taking action against the user or content.

(k) “Verified reporter” means an individual described in, and verified by, the process required by subdivision (b) of Section 22588.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 832, Sec. 1.   (AB 2481)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 22588.4.)
-------------------------------------------

22588.3.

(a) A social media platform shall disclose all social media-related threat reporting procedures for verified reporters described in subdivision (b) in the social media platform’s terms of service.

(b) A large social media platform shall create a process to verify both of the following individuals as verified reporters:

(1) A principal, or a position of similar responsibility, of any school lawfully operating any programs from kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in the state.

(2) A mental health professional licensed pursuant to California
 law who provides mental health services to minors in the state.

(c) In addition to any other reporting mechanism required by state law, a large social media platform shall create a process by which a verified reporter can make a report of a social media-related threat or a violation of the large social media platform’s terms of service that in the verified reporter’s opinion poses a risk or a severe risk to the health and safety of a minor that does all of the following:

(1) Enables, but does not require, an individual to upload a screenshot of the content that contains a social media-related threat or violates the terms of service.

(2) Provides all verified reporters with an electronic point of contact specific to matters involving harms to a minor.

(3) Provides confirmation of the receipt of a submitted report and a means to track that report.

(d) A large social media platform shall do both of the following:

(1) Establish an internal process to receive and substantively respond within 72 hours, or within 24 hours if the report is of a severe risk, to a report by
 a verified reporter of content the verified reporter deems to be a risk to a minor.

(2) Ensure that a report submitted by a verified reporter and deemed by the verified reporter to be of a severe risk receives a review by a natural person.

(e) A large social media platform that receives a report from a verified reporter shall, on a publicly accessible internet website, report annually on all of the following:

(1) The total number of reports from a verified reporter received for the calendar year.

(2) The percentages of each social media-related threat
 that formed the basis for the total number of reports from verified reporters for the calendar year.

(3) The percentage of reports from verified reporters for which the large social media platform took further action.

(f) A large social media platform shall not require a verified reporter to reverify the verified reporter’s qualifications pursuant to subdivision (b) more often than once every two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 832, Sec. 1.   (AB 2481)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 22588.4.)
-------------------------------------------

22588.4.

This chapter shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 832, Sec. 1.   (AB 2481)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.2.9. Cyberbullying Protection Act [22589. - 22589.4.]

22589.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) (1) “Content” means statements or comments made by users and media that are created, posted, shared, or otherwise interacted with by users on an internet-based service or application.

(2) “Content” does not include media put on a service or application exclusively for the purpose of cloud storage, transmitting files, or file collaboration.

(b) “Cyberbullying” means any severe or pervasive conduct made by an electronic act, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (r) of Section 48900 of the Education Code, committed by a person or group of people directed toward one or more minors that has, or can be
 reasonably predicted to have, the effect of any of the following:

(1) Placing a reasonable minor in fear of harm to that minor’s person or property.

(2) Causing a reasonable minor to experience a substantially detrimental effect on the minor’s physical or mental health.

(3) Causing a reasonable minor to experience substantial interference with the minor’s academic performance.

(4) Causing a reasonable minor to experience substantial interference with the minor’s ability to participate in, or benefit from, the services, activities, or privileges provided by a school.

(c) (1) “Severe or pervasive conduct” includes only content that has, or can be reasonably predicted to
 have, the harmful, detrimental, or substantially interfering effects described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(2) “Severe conduct” includes conduct that has, or can be reasonably predicted to have, the harmful, detrimental, or substantially interfering effects described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b). Severe conduct may also include content that does any of the following:

(A) Calls for self-injury or suicide of a minor or a specific person or of a group of individuals related to a minor.

(B) Attacks a minor based on the minor’s experience of sexual assault, sexual exploitation, sexual harassment, or domestic abuse.

(C) Includes statements of intent to engage in a sexual activity or advocating to engage
 in a sexual activity with a minor.

(D) Threatens to release a minor’s telephone number, residential address, images, or email address.

(E) Calls for, or statements of intent to engage in, threats of violence, humiliation, or criminal activity against a minor.

(F) Degrades, or expresses disgust toward, a minor who is depicted in the process of, or right after, menstruating, urinating, vomiting, or defecating.

(G) The identification in this paragraph of particular bases of severe conduct is illustrative rather than restrictive.

(d) “Social media platform” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22675.

(e) “Public or
 semipublic internet-based service or application” excludes a service or application used to facilitate communication within a business or enterprise among employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise, provided that access to the service or application is restricted to employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise using the service or application.

(f) “Terms of service” means a public-facing policy or set of policies adopted by a social media platform that specifies, at least, the user behavior and activities that are permitted on the social media platform and the user behavior and activities that may result in the social media platform taking action against the user or content.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 900, Sec. 1.   (SB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22589.1.

(a) A social media platform shall disclose all cyberbullying reporting procedures in the social media platform’s terms of service.

(b) (1) A social media platform shall establish a prominent mechanism within its internet-based service that allows any individual, whether or not that individual has a profile on the internet-based service, to report cyberbullying or any content that violates the existing terms of service related to cyberbullying.

(2) The mechanism required by this subdivision shall meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The mechanism shall allow, but not require, an individual to upload a screenshot
 of the content that contains cyberbullying or violates the terms of service related to cyberbullying and collect basic identifying information, such as an account identifier, sufficient to permit the social media platform to locate the reported material.

(B) The mechanism shall include, but not be limited to, a method of contacting a reporting individual in writing by a method, including a telephone number for purposes of sending text messages, an email address, or other reasonable electronic method of communication.

(C) A social media platform may offer any other reasonable electronic method of communication in addition to those described in subparagraph (B). A social media platform shall inform a reporting individual of all options for a platform to contact the reporting individual in writing regarding their report, including, but not limited to, the methods listed in
 subparagraph (B). The reporting individual shall choose the method of communication.

(D) The mechanism provides, within 36 hours of receipt of a report, written confirmation to the reporting individual that the social media platform received that individual’s report.

(E) (i) The mechanism provides periodic written updates to the reporting individual as to the status of the social media platform’s handling of the reported material using the reporting individual’s chosen method of communication, pursuant to subparagraph (C).

(ii) The first written update required by clause (i) shall be provided as soon as reasonably feasible but no later than 14 days after the date on which the written confirmation required under subparagraph (D) is provided. Subsequent written updates shall be provided as soon as
 reasonably feasible but no later than every 14 days thereafter, until the final written determination required by subparagraph (F).

(F) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), the mechanism issues a final written determination to the reporting user within 30 days of receiving the report stating one of the following:

(I) The reported material has been determined to be cyberbullying that was displayed, stored, or hosted on the social media platform and has been blocked from being viewable on the social media platform because it violates the platform’s existing terms of service related to cyberbullying. 

(II) The reported material has been determined to be cyberbullying that was displayed, stored, or hosted on the social media platform and has not been, or will not be, blocked on the social media
 platform because it does not violate the platform’s existing terms of service related to cyberbullying. 

(III) The reported material has not been determined to be cyberbullying or to violate the platform’s existing terms of service related to cyberbullying and the reported material has not been, or will not be, blocked on the social media platform.

(IV) The reported material has not been determined to be cyberbullying or to violate the platform’s existing terms of service related to cyberbullying, but the reported material has been blocked from being viewable on the social media platform for reasons unrelated to the platform’s existing terms of service related to cyberbullying.

(V) The reported material has been determined not to be displayed, stored, or hosted on the social media platform.

(ii) If the social media platform cannot comply with clause (i) within 30 days due to circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the social media platform, the social media platform shall comply with clause (i) no later than 60 days after the date on which the covered material was first reported. If this subparagraph applies, the social media platform shall promptly provide written notice of the delay, no later than 48 hours from the time the social media platform knew the delay was likely to occur, to the reporting individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 900, Sec. 2.   (SB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22589.2.

Notwithstanding that any individual may report cyberbullying, or any content that violates a platform’s existing terms of service related to cyberbullying, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 22589.1, actions for relief pursuant to this chapter may be brought only in a civil action by any of the following persons:

(a) A parent or legal guardian of a minor, or an administrator in the school that the minor attends, who submits a report of cyberbullying to the social media platform.

(b) A city attorney, a district attorney, or a county counsel.

(c) The Attorney General, in the name of the people of the State of
 California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 900, Sec. 3.   (SB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22589.3.

(a) (1) Any social media platform that violates a requirement of this chapter shall be liable for ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation and for compensatory damages, punitive damages, and any civil remedies, penalties, or sanctions for harms caused by the social media platform’s failure to comply with this chapter, which damages shall be adjudicated and awarded apart from any harms attributable to the existence of the reported content alone and which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought by any person set forth in Section 22589.2.

(2) In a successful action brought to enforce this chapter, the court may order injunctive relief to obtain compliance with this chapter and may award reasonable attorney’s fees and
 costs to the prevailing plaintiff.

(b) For purposes of this section, each day a social media platform is in violation of a requirement of this chapter constitutes a separate violation.

(c) (1) The remedies provided by this section are in addition to any other civil, criminal, and administrative remedies, penalties, or sanctions provided by law and do not supplant, but are cumulative to, other remedies, penalties, or sanctions.

(2) The duties and obligations imposed by this section are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed under other law and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under other law.

(3) This section does not impose liability on a social media platform if
 such liability is prohibited by Section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 900, Sec. 4.   (SB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22589.4.

This chapter shall not apply to either of the following:

 (a) A social media platform that is controlled by a business entity that generated less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in gross revenue during the preceding calendar year.

(b) A social media platform whose primary function is to allow users to play video games.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 700, Sec. 1.   (AB 2879)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.3. Internet Private Residence Rental Listings [22590. - 22594.]

22590.

As used in this chapter, a “hosting platform” means a marketplace that is created for the primary purpose of facilitating the rental of a residential unit offered for occupancy for tourist or transient use for compensation to the offeror of that unit, and the operator of the hosting platform derives revenues, including booking fees or advertising revenues, from providing or maintaining that marketplace. “Facilitating” includes, but is not limited to, the act of allowing the offeror of the residential unit to offer or advertise the residential unit on the Internet Web site provided or maintained by the operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   (SB 761)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22592.

A hosting platform shall provide the following notice to an offeror listing a residence for short-term rental on the hosting platform:

(a) If you are a tenant who is listing a room, home, mobilehome, condominium, or apartment, please refer to your rental contract or lease, or contact your landlord, prior to listing the property to determine whether your lease or contract contains restrictions that would limit your ability to list your room, home,
 mobilehome, condominium, or apartment. Listing your room, home, mobilehome, condominium, or apartment may be a violation of your lease or contract, and could result in legal action against you by your landlord, including possible eviction.

(b) You should review any restrictions on coverage under your homeowners’ or renters’ insurance policy related to short-term rental activities to ensure that there is appropriate insurance coverage in the event that a person sustains an injury or loss for which you are responsible, a person damages or causes loss to your personal or real property, or a claim or lawsuit is made against you or otherwise arises out of activities related to this hosting platform.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   (SB 1092)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22594.

(a) The notice required by Section 22592 shall be in a font size that is equal to or greater than 100 percent of the standard font size of the other paragraphs on the hosting platform’s Internet Web site or equal to the default font size on the hosting platform’s Internet Web site.

(b) The notice shall be provided immediately before the offeror lists each real property on the hosting platform’s Internet Web site, and shall require the offeror to interact with the hosting platform’s Internet Web site to affirmatively acknowledge he or she has read the notice. This affirmative acknowledgment may be accomplished by the inclusion of a statement in the notice described in Section 22592 that the offeror acknowledges reading this notice before proceeding to list a real
 property with the hosting platform’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 113, Sec. 2.   (SB 1092)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22.4. Food Delivery Platforms [22598. - 22599.6.]

22598.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Clearly and conspicuously” means in a font no smaller than boldface, 14-point type, clearly separate from any other language on the page. For an audio disclosure, “clearly and conspicuously” means in a volume and cadence sufficient to be readily audible and understandable.

(b) “Food delivery platform” means an online business that acts as an intermediary between consumers and multiple food facilities to submit food and beverage orders from a consumer to a participating food facility, and to arrange for, or to complete, the delivery of the order from the food facility to the consumer.

(c) “Food facility” means a food facility, as
 defined in Section 113789 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Forwarded call” means a communication made by a consumer and intended for a food facility, by telephone call or other means of communication, that has been routed by a food delivery platform, or a routing service under the direction of the food delivery platform, to the intended food facility.

(e) “Listing website” means an internet website or application that lists, or produces through search results, telephone numbers associated with food facilities, and that has 100,000,000 or more unique monthly visitors.

(f) “Online order” means an order for food or beverage placed by a customer through or with the assistance of a food delivery platform, including, but not limited to, a telephone order, for delivery.

(g) (1) “Purchase price” means the price, as listed on the menu, for the items contained in an online order.

(2) “Purchase price” does not include taxes, fees, commissions, or gratuities that may make up the total amount charged to the customer of an online order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 898, Sec. 1.   (SB 1490)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22599.

(a) A food delivery platform shall not arrange for the delivery of an order from a food facility without first obtaining an agreement with the food facility expressly authorizing the food delivery platform to take orders and deliver meals prepared by the food facility.

(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), a food delivery platform shall provide to a food facility a mechanism to do both of the following:

(A) Remove the food facility, including its name, address, logo, or menu listing, from the platform within three business days of receiving a request to be removed from the platform. 

(B) Direct the food delivery platform
 to disclose to customers the delivery fee charged to the food facility and each fee, commission, or cost charged to the food facility, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 22599.1.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall interfere with preexisting contractual obligations between a food delivery platform and a food facility.

(c) (1) A food delivery platform shall inform a food facility of both of the following prior to signing an agreement:

(A) The fees charged by the food delivery platform for each service plan offered.

(B) The features included in each service plan, as applicable.

(2) A food delivery platform shall also inform a food facility of
 any change to the agreement referenced in this subdivision that is deemed material and applicable to the food facility.

(d) A food delivery platform shall inform a food facility of all of the following:

(1) How charges for customer order and delivery errors are calculated.

(2) How charges related to errors are allocated between the food delivery platform and the food facility.

(3) The process for food facilities to dispute charges related to errors, including whether disputes may be subject to automatic resolution.

(e) This section shall not require a food delivery platform to reveal information that is confidential, proprietary, or a trade secret.

(f) This section shall not prohibit offering bundled services at a single price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   (SB 1490)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22599.1.

(a) It is unlawful for a food delivery platform to do any of the following:

(1) Charge a customer any purchase price for food or beverage that is higher than the price posted on the food delivery platform’s internet website by the food facility at the time of the order.

(2) Retain any portion of amounts designated as a tip or gratuity. Any tip or gratuity for a delivery order shall be paid by a food delivery platform, in its entirety, to the person delivering the food or beverage. Any tip or gratuity for a pickup order shall be paid by a food delivery platform, in its entirety, to the food facility.

(3) Maintain a payment model that uses any amount designated as tips or gratuity to offset the base pay to the person delivering the food or beverage. 

(b) A food delivery platform shall prominently disclose to the customer and to the food facility an accurate, clearly identified, and itemized cost breakdown of each transaction, including, but not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The purchase price of the food and beverage.
